Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 16. Purchase of Livestock From Unknown Person.

§ 59.1-192.
“Person” defined.

As used in this chapter the term “person” shall mean any individual, partnership, corporation, or other firm or association.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-165; 1968, c. 439.

§ 59.1-193.
Record to be kept by purchaser of livestock delivered by motor vehicle.

It shall be unlawful for any dealer in or slaughterer of livestock to purchase any cattle, sheep, swine or other livestock from any person who is not personally known by the purchaser and who delivers such livestock to the purchaser by means of a motor
truck or other motor vehicle, unless such purchaser shall first record the name and address of the person from whom such purchase is made, the date of the purchase, the license plate numbers of such truck or vehicle, the state where
the same is registered, and a general description of the livestock purchased, including the kind purchased, whether cattle, sheep, swine or other livestock, the number purchased and the approximate weight of the livestock in each lot
purchased.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-166; 1968, c. 439.

§ 59.1-194.
Record available for inspection.

The purchaser shall keep such record for a period of at least six months from the date of purchase. Every such purchaser shall also keep such record available for inspection by the law-enforcement officers of the Commonwealth and the counties, cities
and towns thereof, and shall exhibit it to such officers upon their lawful demand.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-167; 1968, c. 429.

§ 59.1-195.
Penalty for violation.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished, for each offense, by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $100.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-168; 1968, c. 439.